District of Columbia statutes.
32-131.12

Enforcement and penalties.

(a)

(1)

An employee or similarly situated employees injured by a violation of this chapter shall be entitled to maintain a civil action or an administrative action.

(2)

When an administrative complaint is filed against any employer or other person alleged to have violated this chapter, a hearing by an administrative law judge shall be scheduled following the same procedure available in § 32-1308.01 for a violation of Chapter 13 of this title [§ 32-1301 et seq.].

(b)

If an employer fails to allow an employee to use paid leave as required by this chapter, the employer shall pay $500 in additional damages to the employee for each accrued day denied, regardless of whether the employee takes unpaid leave or reports to work on that day.

(c)

Except as provided in § 32-131.09(b), an employer who willfully violates the requirements of this chapter shall be subject to a civil penalty for each affected employee of $1,000 for the 1st offense, $1,500 for the 2nd offense, and $2,000 for the 3rd and each subsequent offense.

(d)

If the Mayor determines that an employer has violated any provision of this chapter, the Mayor shall order the employer to provide affirmative remedies including:

(1)

Back pay for lost wages caused by the employer’s violation of this chapter;

(2)

Reinstatement or other injunctive relief;

(3)

Compensatory damages, punitive damages, and additional damages as provided in subsection (b) of this section; and

(4)

Reasonable attorney’s fees and costs of enforcement.

(e)

An action may be maintained against any employer in a court of competent jurisdiction by any one or more employees for and on behalf of himself or themselves. An employer who violates the provisions of this chapter shall be liable to the employee or employees affected for:

(1)

Back pay for lost wages caused by the employer’s violation of this chapter;

(2)

Reinstatement or other injunctive relief;

(3)

Compensatory damages, punitive damages, and additional damages as provided in subsection (b) of this section; and

(4)

Reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.

(f)

(1)

Where compliance with this chapter or regulations enacted to implement this chapter is not forthcoming, the Mayor shall take any appropriate enforcement action to secure compliance, including initiating a civil action and, except where prohibited by another law, revoking or suspending any registration certificates, permits or licenses held or requested by the employer or person until the violation is remedied.

(2)

To compensate the District for the costs of investigating and remedying the violation, the Department of Employment Services may also order the violating employer or person to pay to the District a sum of not more than $500 for each day or portion thereof and for each employee or person as to whom the violation occurred or continued. The funds recovered by the District under this chapter shall be allocated to offset the costs of implementing and enforcing this chapter.

(g)

In any administrative or civil action brought under this chapter, the Mayor or court shall award interest on all amounts due and unpaid at the rate of interest specified in §  28-3302(b) or §  28-3302(c).

(h)

Any money awarded to an employee under this chapter shall be enforceable by the employee to whom the debt is owed or may be collected by the District on behalf of the employee.

(i)

The administrative fines and penalties collected under this section shall be deposited into the Wage Theft Prevention Fund, established by § 32-1307.01.

May 13, 2008, D.C. Law 17-152, § 13, 55 DCR 3452
Feb. 22, 2014, D.C. Law 20-89, § 2(g), 61 DCR 317
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-157, § 4(d), 61 DCR 10157

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-89: Section 3 of D.C. Law 20-89 provided that the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.

Section 3 of D.C. Law 20-89 was repealed by D.C. Law 20-155, § 7003, effective Feb. 26, 2015.

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-157: Section 7 of D.C. Law 20-157 provided that the act shall apply as of October 1, 2014, and that the act shall apply to violations occurring after October 1, 2014.

For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-157, § 7, see § 4 of the Wage Theft Prevention Correction and Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2016 (D.C. Act 21-293, Jan. 27, 2016, 63 DCR 1215)..
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-157, § 7, see § 4 of the Wage Theft Prevention Correction and Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-188, Oct. 27, 2015, 62 DCR 14224).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-89, § 3, see § 7003 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-89, § 3, see § 7003 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-89, § 3, see § 7003 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (225 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-157, § 7, see § 4 of the Wage Theft Prevention Correction and Clarification Temporary Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Law 21-57, Jan. 30, 2016, 62 DCR 15602).
For temporary (225 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-157, § 7, see § 4 of the Wage Theft Prevention Correction and Clarification Temporary Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Law 20-240, March 13, 2015, 62 DCR 1332).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-157 added (a)(2); substituted “civil penalty for each affected employee” for “civil penalty” in (c); rewrote (d)(3) and (e)(3); and added (i).
The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-89 rewrote this section.